District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.33

Repealed

Organization meetings; purpose; notice.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 277, Pub. L. 87-569, § 33
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-1033.
1981 Ed., § 29-534.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.33.